District of Columbia statutes.
2-573

Rules of construction.

This subchapter shall be construed broadly to maximize public access to meetings. Exceptions shall be construed narrowly and shall permit closure of meetings only as authorized by this chapter.

History

Oct. 21, 1968, Pub. L. 90-614, title IV, § 403
as added Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-350, § 2, 58 DCR 734